North Carolina, session 2025, HB682.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 108A-25.2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 108A-25.2. Exemption from limitations for individuals convicted of certain drug-related
drug-related felonies.
Individuals convicted of Class H or I controlled substance felony offenses in this State shall
be An individual who is otherwise eligible to participate in the Work First Program and or the
food and nutrition services program:program shall be exempt from the application of section
115(a) of the federal Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996,
P.L. 104-193, and shall not be denied assistance from either program solely because the
individual has been convicted of a drug-related felony or felonies upon meeting one of the
following conditions:
(1) Six months after release from custody if no additional controlled substance
felony offense is committed during that period and If in custody, immediately
upon release if the individual can demonstrate successful completion of a
substance abuse treatment program while in custody or continuous active
participation in a required substance abuse treatment program determined
appropriate by the area mental health authority; orauthority.
(2) If not committed to custody, six months immediately after the date of
conviction if no additional controlled substance felony offense is committed
during that period and the individual can demonstrate successful completion
of or continuous active participation in a required substance abuse treatment
program determined appropriate by the area mental health authority.
A county department of social services shall require individuals who are eligible for Work
First Program assistance and electronic food and nutrition benefits pursuant to this section to
undergo substance abuse treatment as a condition for receiving Work First Program or electronic
food and nutrition benefits, if funds and programs are available and to the extent allowed by
federal law."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H682-v-1*